Indiana, session 2026, SB65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-28-3-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) Each school corporation and charter school
shall require all applicants for employment who will have direct,
ongoing contact with children within the scope of the applicant's
employment to attend, before or not later than thirty (30) days
after the start date of the applicant's employment, training
concerning recognition of the signs and symptoms of seizures and
the appropriate steps to be taken to respond to these symptoms.
(b) Each school corporation and charter school shall require all
school employees who have direct, ongoing contact with children
within the scope of the employee's employment to attend the
training described in subsection (a) annually.
(c) The format of the training required under this section may
include:
(1) an in-person presentation;
(2) an electronic or technology based medium, including
2026 IN 65—LS 6210/DI 152


self-review modules available on an online system;
(3) designated materials for an individual program of study;
or
(4) any other method approved by the governing body of a
school corporation or the equivalent authority of a charter
school that is consistent with current professional
development standards.
(d) The training required under this section for a school
employee must be during the school employee's contracted day or
at a time chosen by the employee.
(e) The training required under this section shall count toward
the requirements for professional development required by the
governing body of a school corporation or the equivalent authority
of a charter school.
(f) The training provided under this section must be consistent
with the training programs and guidelines developed by the
Epilepsy Foundation of America or a successor organization.
2026 IN 65—LS 6210/DI 152